el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ για σκάφη > Μέρη εξάτμισης σκαφών: Σωλήνες και εξαρτήματα σύνδεσης εξάτμισης σκαφών; Ανυψωτές και γωνίες εξάτμισης σκαφών; Σωληναγωγοί σκαφών; Σιγαστήρες και ανταλλακτικά σκαφών
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Dijelovi i dodaci za plovila > Dijelovi ispušne cijevi za plovila: Ispušna crijeva i spojnice za plovila; Ispušna koljena za plovila; Razvodnik za plovila; Prigušivači i dijelovi za plovila
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Peças e acessórios para embarcações > Peças de escapamento de embarcações: Conexões e mangueiras de escapamento de embarcações; Risers e cotovelos de escapamento de embarcações; Coletores de embarcações; Silenciadores e peças de embarcações
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Части и аксесоари за плавателни съдове > Части за система изпускателна система на плавателни съдове: Маркучи и фитинги за изпускателна система на плавателни съдове; Изпускателни тръби и колена за плавателни съдове; Колектори за плавателни съдове; Ауспуси и части за плавателни съдове
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Pièces détachées et accessoires nautiques > Pièces d’échappement pour bateaux: Tuyaux et raccords d’échappement pour embarcations; Coudes et rehausses d’échappement pour embarcations; Collecteurs pour bateaux; Silencieux et pièces détachées pour bateaux
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Deli in dodatki za vodna plovila > Deli za izpušne sisteme vodnih plovil: Izpušne cevi in priključki za plovila; Dvižni in kolenski deli izpuha za plovila; Razdelilniki za vodna plovila; Dušilniki in deli za vodna plovila
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Запчасти и аксессуары для водного транспорта > Детали выхлопной системы водного транспорта: Выхлопные шланги и фитинги для водного транспорта; Райзеры и колена выхлопной системы водного транспорта; Выпускные коллекторы для водного транспорта; Глушители для водного транспорта и их детали
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 船艇零件/配件 > 船舶排气装置: 船舶排气软管和配件; 船舶排气立管和弯头; 船舶排气歧管; 船舶消声器及配件
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Díly a příslušenství k motorovým člunům > Výfuky motorových člunů a jejich součásti: Hadice a fitinky výfuků plavidel; Sběrná potrubí a kolena výfuků plavidel; Sběrná potrubí pro motorové čluny; Tlumiče motorových člunů a jejich součásti
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Delar och tillbehör till fartyg > Delar till avgassystem för fartyg: Avgasslangar och kopplingar för sjöfarkoster; Avgasrisers och knän för sjöfarkoster; Grenrör för fartyg; Ljuddämpare och ljuddämpardelar för fartyg
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre plavidlá > Diely výfuku plavidla: Výfukové hadice a armatúry pre plavidlá; Výfukové stúpačky a kolená pre plavidlá; Potrubia plavidiel; Tlmiče a diely pre plavidlá
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Wasserfahrzeugteile & Zubehör > Wasserfahrzeugauspuffteile: Auspuffschläuche & -anschlüsse für Wasserfahrzeuge; Auspuffkrümmer & -bögen für Wasserfahrzeuge; Wasserfahrzeugkrümmer; Schalldämpfer & Teile für Wasserfahrzeuge
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Vízijármű-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Vízijárműkipufogó-alkatrészek: Vízijármű-kipufogócsövek és -szerelvények; Vízijármű-kipufogókönyökök és emelőcsövek; Vízijármű-elosztók; Vízijármű-hangtompítók és -alkatrészek
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Båtdeler og -tilbehør > Eksosdeler for båt: Eksosslanger og -koblinger for vannfartøy; Eksosbenn og -albuer for vannfartøy; Manifolder for båt; Støydempere og deler for båt
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Części i akcesoria do jednostek pływających > Części układu wydechowego do jednostek pływających: Węże i złączki do układów wydechowych jednostek pływających; Kolektory podwyższające i kolanka wydechowe do jednostek pływających; Kolektory do jednostek pływających; Tłumiki i części tłumików do jednostek pływających
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Dele og tilbehør til fartøjer > Udstødningsdele til fartøjer: Udstødningsslanger og fittings til fartøjer; Udstødningsknæ og forhøjere til fartøjer; Forgreningskamre til fartøjer; Lyddæmpere og dele til fartøjer
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Accesorios y piezas para embarcaciones > Piezas de escape para embarcaciones: Mangueras y conexiones de escape para embarcaciones; Elevadores y codos de escape para embarcaciones; Distribuidores para embarcaciones; Piezas y silenciadores para embarcaciones
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > Bộ phận & linh kiện tàu thuyền > Bộ phận xả của tàu thủy: Ống và đầu nối hệ thống xả phương tiện đường thủy; Cổ góp và ống nối chữ L hệ thống xả phương tiện đường thủy; Ống dẫn trên tàu thủy; Ống giảm thanh tàu thuyền
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 船舶パーツ・関連用品 > 船舶排気系パーツ: ウォータークラフト用エキゾーストホース・フィッティング; ウォータークラフト用エキゾーストライザー・エルボ; 船舶用マニホールド; 船舶用マフラー・関連パーツ
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 船艇零件/配件 > 船艇排水管零件: 水上載具排氣軟管與接頭; 水上載具排氣立管與彎頭; 船艇進氣歧管; 船舶消音器和零件
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Vandens transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Vandens transporto priemonių išmetimo sistemos dalys: Vandens transporto priemonių išmetimo žarnos ir jungtys; Vandens transporto priemonių išmetimo pakėlėjai ir alkūnės; Vandens transporto priemonių kolektoriai; Vandens transporto priemonių duslintuvai ir dalys
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Acessórios e peças para embarcações > Peças de escape para embarcações: Tubos e encaixes de escape para embarcações; Coletores e cotovelos de escape para embarcações; Coletores para embarcações; Peças e panelas para embarcações
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Su Jetli Tekne Parçaları ve Aksesuarları > Tekne Egsoz Parçaları: Deniz aracı egzoz hortumları ve bağlantı parçaları; Deniz aracı egzoz yükselticileri ve dirsekleri; Tekne Manifoldları; Tekne Egsoz Susturucuları ve Parçaları
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Parti e accessori imbarcazioni > Parti di scarico imbarcazioni: Tubi e raccordi di scarico per natanti; Riser e gomiti di scarico per natanti; Collettori imbarcazioni; Silenziatori e parti imbarcazioni
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์เรือ > อะไหล่ท่อไอเสียเรือ: ท่ออ่อนและข้อต่อท่อไอเสียเรือ; ท่อคอห่านและข้องอท่อไอเสียเรือ; ท่อร่วมของเรือ; ท่อไอเสียและชิ้นส่วนเรือ
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Watercraft Parts & Accessories > Watercraft Exhaust Parts: Watercraft Exhaust Hoses & Fittings; Watercraft Exhaust Risers & Elbows; Watercraft Manifolds; Watercraft Mufflers & Parts
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Piese și accesorii pentru ambarcațiuni > Piese evacuare ambarcațiuni: Furtunuri și racorduri de evacuare pentru ambarcațiuni; Coturi și racorduri de evacuare pentru ambarcațiuni; Rezervoare ambarcațiuni; Amortizoare de zgomot ambarcațiuni
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 선박 부품/부대용품 > 선박 배기 부품: 수상 기구 배기 호스 및 피팅; 수상 기구 배기 라이저 및 엘보; 선박 매니폴드; 선박용 소음기/부품
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Onderdelen en accessoirs voor vaartuigen > Uitlaatonderdelen voor vaartuigen: Uitlaatslangen en -fittingen voor vaartuigen; Uitlaatrisers en -bochten voor vaartuigen; Spruitstukken voor vaartuigen; Knaldempers en onderdelen voor vaartuigen
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Veneen osat ja tarvikkeet > Veneen pakojärjestelmän osat: Vesikulkuneuvojen pakoputkiston letkut ja liittimet; Vesikulkuneuvojen pakoputkiston nousuputket ja käyrät; Veneen imusarjat; Veneen äänenvaimentimet